en: Racquet Vibration Dampeners
xx: Racquet Vibration Dampeners
cs: Tlumiče vibrací na tenisové rakety
da: Ketsjerstøddæmpere
de: Schlägerdämpfer
es: Antivibradores de raquetas
fr: Antivibrateurs pour raquettes
it: Antivibrazioni per racchette
ja: ラケット振動止め
nl: Trillingsdempers voor rackets
no: Vibrasjonsdempere for tennisracketer
pl: Tłumiki drgań do rakiet tenisowych
pt: Amortecedores de vibração de raquetes
ru: Демпферы для ракеток
sv: Racketvibrationsdämpare
tr: Raket Titreşim Sönümleyicileri

en: Tennis Racquet Bags
xx: Tennis Racquet Bags
cs: Brašny na tenisové rakety
da: Tasker til tennisketsjere
de: Tennistaschen
es: Raqueteros
fr: Sacs de raquettes de tennis
it: Borse per racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケットケース
nl: Tassen voor tennisrackets
no: Tennisballbager
pl: Torby na rakiety tenisowe
pt: Bolsas para raquetes de tênis
ru: Сумки для теннисных ракеток
sv: Tennisracketväskor
tr: Tenis Raketi Çantaları

en: Tennis Racquet Grips & Tape
xx: Tennis Racquet Grips & Tape
cs: Pásky a gripy na tenisové rakety
da: Ketsjergriptape
de: Griffbänder
es: Cintas para empuñaduras de raquetas de tenis
fr: Bandes antidérapantes pour raquettes de tennis
it: Nastri e impugnature per racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケット用グリップテープ
nl: Grips en tape voor tennisrackets
no: Grep og teip til tennisracketer
pl: Owijki rakiet tenisowych
pt: Fita e cabos de raquete de tênis
ru: Обмотки и ленты для ручек теннисных ракеток
sv: Tejp för racketgrepp
tr: Tenis Raket Gripleri ve Bantları

en: Tennis Racquet Grommets
xx: Tennis Racquet Grommets
cs: Průchodky na tenisové rakety
da: Splitter til tennisketsjere
de: Ösenbänder für Tennisschläger
es: Protectores de raquetas de tenis
fr: Œillets de raquettes de tennis
it: Gommini per racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケット用グロメット
nl: Grommets voor tennisrackets
no: Kauser til tennisracketer
pl: Pierścienie wzmacniające do rakiet tenisowych
pt: Ilhós da raquete de tênis
ru: Втулки для теннисных ракеток
sv: Grommets till tennisracketar
tr: Tenis Raketi Grometleri

en: Tennis Racquet String
xx: Tennis Racquet String
cs: Struny na výplet tenisových raket
da: Strenge til tennisketsjere
de: Tennissaiten
es: Cuerdas de raquetas de tenis
fr: Cordages de raquettes de tennis
it: Corde per racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケット用ガット
nl: Snaren voor tennisrackets
no: Strenger til tennisracketer
pl: Naciągi rakiet tenisowych
pt: Corda da raquete de tênis
ru: Струны для теннисных ракеток
sv: Tennissträngar
tr: Tenis Raketi Teli

en: Tennis Racquets
xx: Tennis Racquets
cs: Tenisové rakety
da: Tennisketsjere
de: Tennisschläger
es: Raquetas de tenis
fr: Raquettes de tennis
it: Racchette da tennis
ja: テニスラケット
nl: Tennisrackets
no: Tennisracketer
pl: Rakiety tenisowe
pt: Raquetes de tênis
ru: Теннисные ракетки
sv: Tennisracketar
tr: Tenis Raketleri

en: Track & Field
xx: Track & Field
cs: Atletika
da: Baneatletik
de: Leichtathletik
es: Atletismo
fr: Athlétisme
it: Tracciato e campo atletica
ja: 陸上
nl: Atletiek
no: Friidrett
pl: Lekkoatletyka
pt: Atletismo
ru: Товары для беговых видов легкой атлетики
sv: Friidrott
tr: Atletizm

en: Discus
xx: Discus
cs: Atletické disky
da: Diskos
de: Diskusscheiben
es: Discos
fr: Disques
it: Dischi
ja: 円盤投げ
nl: Discussen
no: Diskos
pl: Dyski
pt: Discos
ru: Метательные диски
sv: Diskusar
tr: Diskler

en: High Jump Crossbars
xx: High Jump Crossbars
cs: Laťky pro skok vysoký
da: Højdespringsoverliggere
de: Hochsprunglatten
es: Barras de salto de altura
fr: Barres de saut en hauteur
it: Aste per salto in alto
ja: 高跳びバー
nl: Hoogspringlatten
no: Stenger til høydehopp
pl: Poprzeczki do skoku wzwyż
pt: Sarrafo para salto em altura
ru: Перекладины для прыжков в высоту
sv: Höjdhoppsribbor
tr: Yüksek Atlama Çıtaları

en: High Jump Pits
xx: High Jump Pits
cs: Doskočiště pro skok vysoký
da: Højdespringsmadrasser
de: Hochsprungmatten
es: Colchonetas de salto de altura
fr: Matelas de saut en hauteur
it: Materassini salto in alto
ja: 高跳びピット
nl: Hoogspringmatten
no: Høydehoppmatter
pl: Zeskoki do skoku wzwyż
pt: Almofada para salto em altura
ru: Ямы для прыжков в высоту
sv: Höjdhoppsbäddar
tr: Yüksek Atlama Çukurları

en: Javelins
xx: Javelins
cs: Oštěpy
da: Spydkast
de: Speere
es: Jabalinas
fr: Javelots
it: Giavellotti
ja: やり投げ
nl: Speerwerpen
no: Spyd
pl: Oszczepy
pt: Dardos de arremesso
ru: Метательные копья
sv: Kastspjut
tr: Cirit

en: Pole Vault Pits
xx: Pole Vault Pits
cs: Doskočiště pro skok o tyči
da: Stangspringsmadrasser
de: Stabhochsprungmatten
es: Colchonetas de salto con pértiga
fr: Matelas de saut à la perche
it: Cassette imbucata per asta
ja: 棒高跳びピット
nl: Polsstokhoogspringmatten
no: Stavsprangmatter
pl: Zeskoki do skoku o tyczce
pt: Almofada para salto com vara
ru: Ямы для прыжков с шестом
sv: Stavhoppsbäddar
tr: Sırıkla Atlama Çukurları

en: Relay Batons
xx: Relay Batons
cs: Štafetové kolíky
da: Stafetter
de: Staffelstäbe
es: Testigos
fr: Témoins
it: Testimoni
ja: リレーバトン
nl: Estafettestokjes
no: Stafettpinner
pl: Pałeczki sztafetowe
pt: Bastões de revezamento
ru: Эстафетные палочки
sv: Stafettpinnar
tr: Bayrak Yarışı Batonları

en: Shot Puts
xx: Shot Puts
cs: Vrhací koule
da: Kuglestød
de: Kugelstoß-Kugeln
es: Bolas de lanzamiento de peso
fr: Poids
it: Pesi per getto del peso
ja: 砲丸投げ
nl: Stootkogels
no: Kulestøtkuler
pl: Kule do pchania
pt: Arremesso de peso
ru: Спортивные ядра
sv: Kulstötningskulor
tr: Gülleler

en: Starter Pistols
xx: Starter Pistols
cs: Startovací pistole
da: Startpistoler
de: Startpistolen
es: Pistolas de salida
fr: Pistolets de starter
it: Pistole starter
ja: スターターピストル
nl: Startpistolen
no: Startpistoler
pl: Pistolety startowe
pt: Pistola de partida
ru: Стартовые пистолеты
sv: Startpistoler
tr: Yarış Tabancaları

en: Throwing Hammers
xx: Throwing Hammers
cs: Vrhací kladiva
da: Hammerkast
de: Wurfhämmer
es: Martillos de lanzamiento
fr: Marteaux à lancer
it: Martelli da lancio
ja: ハンマー投げ
nl: Slingerhamers
no: Sleggekastslegger
pl: Młoty do rzucania
pt: Martelos para arremesso
ru: Метательные молоты
sv: Släggkastningssläggor
tr: Fırlatma Çekiçleri

en: Track Hurdles
xx: Track Hurdles
cs: Atletické překážky
da: Hække til hækkeløb
de: Hürden
es: Vallas
fr: Haies
it: Ostacoli
ja: ハードル
nl: Baanhorden
no: Hekker til hekkeløp
pl: Płotki
pt: Obstáculos de pista de atletismo
ru: Барьеры для бега
sv: Häcklöpningshäckar
tr: Koşu Engelleri

en: Track Starting Blocks
xx: Track Starting Blocks
cs: Startovní bloky
da: Startblokke til løb
de: Startblöcke
es: Tacos de salida para pista
fr: Starting-blocks
it: Blocchi di partenza per atletica
ja: スターティングブロック
nl: Startblokken voor sportbanen
no: Startblokker for friidrett
pl: Bloki startowe
pt: Blocos de partida para corrida
ru: Стартовые колодки
sv: Startblock för löparbanor
tr: Koşu Pisti Çıkış Takozları

en: Vaulting Poles
xx: Vaulting Poles
cs: Skokanské tyče
da: Stangspringsstænger
de: Stabhochsprungstäbe
es: Pértigas
fr: Perches
it: Aste per salto
ja: 棒高跳びポール
nl: Hoogspringpolsstokken
no: Stavsprangstaver
pl: Tyczki
pt: Vara para salto
ru: Шесты
sv: Stavhoppsstavar
tr: Atlama Sırıkları

en: Volleyball
xx: Volleyball
cs: Volejbal
da: Volleyball
de: Volleyball
es: Voleibol
fr: Volley-ball
it: Pallavolo
ja: バレーボール用品
nl: Volleybal
no: Volleyball
pl: Siatkówka
pt: Vôlei
ru: Товары для волейбола
sv: Volleyboll
tr: Voleybol